Illinois, session 104th, SB1296.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 is 5amended by changing Section 33.1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 5/33.1)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-33.1)7    Sec. 33.1. (a) The Department of Agriculture shall be 8responsible for investigating and determining the eligibility 9of mares and Illinois conceived and foaled horses and Illinois 10foaled horses to participate in Illinois conceived and foaled 11and Illinois foaled races. The Department of Agriculture shall 12also qualify stallions to participate in the Illinois 13Standardbred and Thoroughbred programs.14    (b) The Director of the Department of Agriculture or his 15authorized agent is authorized to conduct hearings, administer 16oaths, and issue subpoenas to carry out his responsibilities 17concerning the Illinois Standardbred and Thoroughbred programs 18as set forth in Sections 30 and 31.19    (c) The Director of the Department of Agriculture or his 20authorized agent shall, after a hearing, affirm or deny the 21qualification of a stallion for the Illinois Standardbred or 22Thoroughbred program. The decision of the Director of the 23Department of Agriculture or his authorized agent shall be   SB1296- 2 -LRB104 08842 BDA 18897 b1subject to judicial review under the Administrative Review 2Law. The term "administrative decision" shall have the meaning 3ascribed to it in Section 3-101 of the Administrative Review 4Law.5    (d) If the determination is made that a standardbred 6stallion is not owned by a resident of the State of Illinois or 7that a transfer of ownership is a subterfuge to qualify a 8standardbred stallion under the Act, or that a standardbred 9stallion owner, manager, or person associated with him or her 10has knowingly participated in the arrangements for 11transporting semen from a standardbred stallion registered 12under this Act out-of-state, the Director of the Department of 13Agriculture or his authorized agent shall immediately publish 14notice of such fact in publications devoted to news concerning 15standardbred horses, announcing the disqualification of such 16stallion or his foals. From January 1, 2018 until January 1, 172022, the Director of Agriculture or his or her authorized 18agent shall not publish notice announcing the disqualification 19of such stallion or his foals on the basis that a stallion 20owner, manager, or person associated with him or her has 21knowingly participated in the arrangements for transporting 22semen from a standardbred stallion registered under this Act 23out of State. If any person owning any stallion, mare, or foal 24is found by the Director of the Department of Agriculture or 25his authorized agent to have willfully violated any provision 26of this Act or to have made any false statements concerning   SB1296- 3 -LRB104 08842 BDA 18897 b1such person's stallion, mare, or foal, then no animal owned by 2such person is eligible to participate in any events conducted 3pursuant to Sections 30 and 31.4    (e) Any person who is served with a subpoena, issued by the 5Director of the Department of Agriculture or his authorized 6agent, to appear and testify or to produce documents and who 7refuses or neglects to testify or produce documents relevant 8to the investigation, as directed in the subpoenas, may be 9punished as provided in this Section.10    (f) Any circuit court of this State, upon petition by the 11Director of the Department of Agriculture or his authorized 12agent, may compel the attendance of witnesses, the production 13of documents and giving the testimony required by this Section 14in the same manner as the production of evidence may be 15compelled in any other judicial proceeding before such court. 16Any person who willfully swears or affirms falsely in any 17proceeding conducted pursuant to this Section is guilty of 18perjury.19    (g) The fees of witnesses for attendance and travel in the 20course of any investigation shall be the same as the fees of 21witnesses before the circuit courts of this State.22    (h) The Department shall have authority to promulgate 23rules and regulations for the enforcement of Sections 30, 31 24and 33.1 of this Act. Conditions and purses shall not be 25subject to Section 5-40 of the Illinois Administrative 26Procedure Act but shall be set and published from time to time.  SB1296- 4 -LRB104 08842 BDA 18897 b1(Source: P.A. 100-777, eff. 8-10-18.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 32025.